Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2172
Parties; lienholders.

Creditors having a specific or general lien upon all or any portion of the property may or may not be made parties, at the option of the plaintiff.

R.S.1867, Code § 804, p. 538;

R.S.1913, § 8287;

C.S.1922, § 9240;

C.S.1929, § 20-2172;

R.S.1943, § 25-2172.

Plaintiff in partition suit may at his option make holder of tax lien a party to the suit. Fairley v. Kemper, 174 Neb. 565, 118 N.W.2d 754 (1962).

Creditor having a specific or a general lien upon property being partitioned may or may not be made a party at the option of the plaintiff. Majerus v. Santo, 143 Neb. 774, 10 N.W.2d 608 (1943).